Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; CIVIC EDUCATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Civic education grants. new text end new text begin (a) For the YMCA Center for Youth Voice to support civic education programs for youth 18 years of age and under and to provide teacher professional development, educational resources, and program support: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 300,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 300,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The civic education programs must instruct students in: new text end new text begin (1) the constitutional principles and the democratic foundation of our national, state, and local institutions; and new text end new text begin (2) the political processes and structures of government, grounded in the understanding of constitutional government and individual rights. new text end new text begin (c) Any balance in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end